Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1037.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 503 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 Section 503. Contents of Subdivision and Land Development Ordinance.--The subdivision and land development ordinance may include, but need not be limited to:* * *(4.2) Provisions which provide that if a one-family or two-family dwelling is demolished and replaced by another residential structure that conforms substantially to the same manner and use as the replaced one-family or two-family dwelling, the municipality may allow the new residential structure to be constructed in accordance with the setback standards of the replaced one-family or two-family dwelling and shall provide the setback standards to the building permit applicant.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1037PN1121 - 2 - 123456789101112131415